Maryland, session 2026, HB1199.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Department” means the Department of the Environment.
(3) “Program” means an economy–wide cap–and–invest program.
(b) (1) The Department shall, in collaboration with the Maryland Commission
on Climate Change, the Maryland Department of Transportation, and the Maryland
Energy Administration, and in coordination with the Commission on Environmental
Justice and Sustainable Communities and any other agency or stakeholder identified by
the Department, complete a study and develop a report evaluating the potential design and
implications of implementing an economy–wide cap–and–invest program that:
(i) places the State on a pathway to achieve its greenhouse gas
emissions reduction targets under § 2–1204.2 of the Environment Article; and
(ii) provides a sustainable funding source for climate–related
initiatives.
(2) The Department shall engage with stakeholders during the study,
including soliciting input and feedback on:
(i) program design;
(ii) revenue use;
(iii) equity considerations; and
(iv) other components of a program.
(c) The study shall:
(1) evaluate, at a minimum, program design elements regarding:

HOUSE BILL 1199 3
(i) covered sectors and entities, including evaluating and
considering:
1. major sources of greenhouse gas emissions within the
State;
2. minimizing administrative and compliance burdens,
including establishing requirements for relevant agencies at the beginning of the
administrative or compliance process;
3. the benefits and drawbacks of including electricity
generation under a program in addition to its coverage under the Regional Greenhouse Gas
Initiative; and
4. the benefits and drawbacks of including electricity
generated in and imported from states that do not participate in the Regional Greenhouse
Gas Initiative;
(ii) the use of facility–specific limits or other mechanisms to limit
greenhouse gas emissions from facilities located in or near overburdened communities;
(iii) the treatment of emissions–intensive, trade–exposed industries,
including identifying methods to protect against competitiveness impacts while accounting
for facility proximity to overburdened communities;
(iv) the distribution of allowances, including potential no–cost
allowance allocations to gas and electric utilities to mitigate the cost to customers;
(v) auction design, including mechanisms enabling allowance
auctions to respond automatically to changes in market price and demand;
(vi) the use of offset credits, including whether to allow offsets for a
portion of compliance and evaluating the assumption that annual allowance budgets would
be reduced to account for the offsets; and
(vii) any other design elements the Department or any other entity
identified in subsection (b)(1) of this section considers necessary to ensure an effective,
equitable, and efficient program;
(2) consider:
(i) the potential uses of revenue generated through a program,
including:
1. providing rebates, weatherization services, and other
measures to reduce energy costs and protect low– and moderate–income households;

HOUSE BILL 1199
2. expanding clean energy and energy efficiency programs;
3. investing in cleaner, more equitable, and more efficient
transportation systems;
4. investing in technologies and programs that remove
carbon from the atmosphere;
5. enhancing the climate resiliency of waters, forests, and
vital ecosystems;
6. investing in the State’s economy and communities to make
them more resilient to climate impacts and extreme weather;
7. workforce development in clean energy and
climate–related fields; and
8. other investments to promote a rapid, effective, and
equitable transition to a decarbonized economy;
(ii) the implications of some or all of the revenue generated through
a program being temporarily diverted to other non–climate–related expenditures; and
(iii) the implications of linking a Maryland program with similar
programs in other North American jurisdictions, including considering:
1. design elements necessary to facilitate the linkage; and
2. the efficacy of linking the program compared with the
efficacy of not linking the program; and
(3) include modeling and an analysis of:
(i) the potential impacts of a program on:
1. achieving the State’s greenhouse gas emissions reduction
targets;
2. energy affordability for consumers; and
3. the State’s economy and economic competitiveness;
(ii) remedial measures, if needed, to address potential adverse
impacts of a program;
(iii) strategies to ensure that low–income households do not
experience a net increase in costs resulting from a program; and

HOUSE BILL 1199 5
(iv) the potential impact of existing and anticipated changes to
federal funding and regulatory programs.
(d) The Department may contract with a consultant with expertise in economics
and environmental policy to conduct all or part of the study.
(e) (1) Funding for the study shall be provided from the Maryland Strategic
Energy Investment Fund under § 9–20B–05 of the State Government Article.
(2) If a program is implemented on or before June 30, 2030, funding
provided for the study under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be reimbursed from
revenue generated by the program.
(f) On or before December 31, 2027, the Department shall submit the report
required under this section to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.